Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2412
Internship, defined.

Internship means that aspect of the educational program of the associate degree in long-term care administration which allows for practical experience in a nursing home and occurs under the supervision of a certified preceptor.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 827.